Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2068XS (3) 91 je/js S.F. 101 Section 1. Section 91D.1, subsection 1, paragraphs a and d, 1 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. (1) The state hourly wage shall be at least $6.20 as of 3 April 1, 2007, and $7.25 as of January 1, 2008 , and $15.00 as of 4 July 1, 2025 . 5 (2) The state hourly wage, including the state hourly wage 6 for the first ninety calendar days of employment provided in 7 paragraph âdâ , shall be increased annually on July 1, beginning 8 July 1, 2026, by the same percentage as the cost-of-living 9 increase, if any, in federal social security benefits 10 authorized during the previous state fiscal year by the federal 11 social security administration pursuant to section 215 of the 12 federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Â§415. In no case shall 13 the state hourly wage be decreased. 14 d. An employer is not required to pay an employee the 15 applicable state hourly wage provided in paragraph âaâ until the 16 employee has completed ninety calendar days of employment with 17 the employer. An employer shall pay an employee who has not 18 completed ninety calendar days of employment with the employer 19 an hourly wage of at least $5.30 as of April 1, 2007, and $6.35 20 as of January 1, 2008 , and $14.10 as of July 1, 2025 . 21